North Carolina, session 2025, HB1058.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

TOWN OF VASS DEANNEXATION
SECTION 1.(a) The following described property, identified by Moore County Tax
Property Identification Numbers, is removed from the corporate limits of the Town of Vass:
950300365918, 950300363850, 950300362794, and 950300361693.
SECTION 1.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town
of Vass for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of this
section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this section as
though the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Vass.
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.

TOWN OF RED OAK DEANNEXATION
SECTION 2.(a) The following described property, identified by Nash County Parcel
Identification Numbers, is removed from the corporate limits of the Town of Red Oak:
382110465092 and 382115547627.
SECTION 2.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town
of Red Oak for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of
this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this section
as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Red Oak.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.

TOWN OF KERNERSVILLE DEANNEXATION
SECTION 3.(a) The following described property, identified by Forsyth County Tax
Property Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the Town of
Kernersville: 6896-04-9921.
*H1058-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town
of Kernersville for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date
of this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this
section as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Kernersville.
SECTION 3.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.

VILLAGE OF WALNUT CREEK DEANNEXATION
SECTION 4.(a) The following described property, as identified by Wayne County
Tax Parcel Identification Numbers, is removed from the corporate limits of the Village of Walnut
Creek:
PARCEL A:
The portion of Parcel No. 3536159662 lying north of Dollard Town Road (State Road No.
1727), being approximately 1 acre and more particularly described in the deed to Diamond
Poultry Farms, Inc. (now Sleepy Creek Farms, Inc.), dated November 7, 1961, and recorded in
Deed Book 559, Page 134, of the Wayne County Registry.
PARCEL B:
Parcel No. 3536267029, including the right-of-way of Dollard Town Road (State Road No.
1727), being approximately 19 acres and more particularly described in the deed to Sleepy Creek
Farms, Inc., dated August 26, 1996, and recorded in Deed Book 1552, Page 890, of the Wayne
County Registry.
PARCEL C:
Parcel No. 3536370039, being approximately 23 acres and more particularly described in the
deed to Goldsboro Milling Company, dated September 9, 1980, and recorded in Book 993, Page
280, of the Wayne County Registry.
SECTION 4.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the
Village of Walnut Creek for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the
effective date of this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective
date of this section as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the Village of
Walnut Creek.
SECTION 4.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.

LIMIT CERTAIN POWERS OF THE VILLAGE OF WALNUT CREEK
SECTION 5.(a) Chapter 55 of the 1977 Session Laws is repealed.
SECTION 5.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 160D-202, or any other
provision of law, the Village of Walnut Creek shall not exercise any powers granted to cities in
Chapter 160D of the General Statutes in any area beyond its contiguous corporate limits.
SECTION 5.(c) The relinquishment of jurisdiction by the Village of Walnut Creek
over the area beyond its contiguous corporate limits shall become effective on the date this act
becomes law; provided, however, the Village's development regulations and powers of
enforcement shall remain in effect in that area until the time provided in G.S. 160D-202(h).
SECTION 5.(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section or any other
provision of law to the contrary, any acquisition, conveyance, transfer, or acceptance of real
property or interest in real or personal property by the Village of Walnut Creek occurring prior
to the effective date of this section is hereby ratified, validated, confirmed, and approved in all
respects as if the Village of Walnut Creek had possessed full legal authority to undertake such
action at the time it occurred.

Page 2 House Bill 1058-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1058-Second Edition Page 3